Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1606.03
Group life insurance; policy; requirements.

(1) Group life insurance offered to a resident of this state under a group life insurance policy issued to a group other than one described in sections 21-1740, 44-1602 to 44-1606.02, and 44-1615 shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) A group life insurance policy shall not be delivered in this state unless the Director of Insurance finds that:

(i) The issuance of the group policy is not contrary to the best interests of the public;

(ii) The issuance of the group policy would result in economies of acquisition or administration; and

(iii) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums charged;

(b) A group life insurance policy shall not be offered in this state by an insurer under a policy issued in another state unless this state or another state having requirements substantially similar to those contained in subdivision (1)(a) of this section has made a determination that the requirements have been met;

(c) The premium for the policy shall be paid either from the policyholder's funds or from funds contributed by the covered persons, or from both; and

(d) An insurer may exclude or limit the coverage on any person as to whom evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer.

(2)(a) In the case of a program of insurance which, if issued on a group basis, would not qualify under sections 21-1740, 44-1602 to 44-1606.02, and 44-1615, the insurer shall cause to be distributed to prospective insureds a written notice that compensation shall or may be paid, if compensation of any kind shall or may be paid, to:

(i) A policyholder or sponsoring or endorsing entity in the case of a group policy; or

(ii) A sponsoring or endorsing entity in the case of an individual, blanket, or franchise policy marketed by means of direct response solicitation.

(b) The notice shall be distributed:

(i) Whether compensation is direct or indirect; and

(ii) Whether the compensation is paid to or retained by the policyholder or sponsoring or endorsing entity, or paid to or retained by a third party at the direction of the policyholder or sponsoring or endorsing entity, or an entity affiliated therewith by way of ownership, contract, or employment.

(c) The notice required by this section shall be placed on or accompany an application or enrollment form provided to prospective insureds.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(i) Direct response solicitation means a solicitation by a sponsoring or endorsing entity through the mail, telephone, or other mass communications media; and

(ii) Sponsoring or endorsing entity means an organization that has arranged for the offering of a program of insurance in a manner that communicates that eligibility for participation in the program is dependent upon affiliation with the organization or that it encourages participation in the program.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 15.